Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-114
Department; fees for services.

In addition to any other fees and charges provided by law, the following
shall be due and payable to the Department of Insurance: (1) For filing the
documents, papers, statements, and information required by law upon the organization
of domestic or the entry of foreign or alien insurers, statistical agents,
or advisory organizations, three hundred dollars; (2) for filing each amendment
of articles of incorporation, twenty dollars; (3) for filing restated articles
of incorporation, twenty dollars; (4) for renewing each certificate of authority
of insurers, statistical agents, or advisory organizations, one hundred dollars,
except domestic assessment associations, which shall pay twenty dollars; (5) for
issuance of an amended certificate of authority, one hundred dollars; (6)
for filing a certified copy of articles of merger involving a domestic or
foreign insurance corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact
insurance business in this state, fifty dollars; (7) for filing an annual
statement, two hundred dollars; (8) for each certificate of valuation, deposit,
or compliance or other certificate for whomsoever issued, five dollars; (9)
for filing any report which may be required by the department from any unincorporated
mutual association, no fee shall be due; (10)
for copying official records or documents, fifty cents per page; and (11)
for a preadmission review of documents required to be filed for the admission
of a foreign insurer or for the organization and licensing of a domestic insurer
other than an assessment association, a nonrefundable fee of one thousand
dollars.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 19, p. 406;

R.S.1913, § 3155;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 12, p. 584;

C.S.1922, § 7756;

C.S.1929, § 44-212;

Laws 1935, c. 101, § 1, p. 330;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-212;

R.S.1943, § 44-114;

Laws 1955, c. 168, § 2, p. 478;

Laws 1965, c. 250, § 1, p. 708;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 3, p. 1269;

Laws 1969, c. 360, § 1, p. 1282;

Laws 1977, LB 333, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 31;

Laws 1984, LB 801, § 46;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 233, § 42;

Laws 2003, LB 216, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 1.

All fees must be paid to State Treasurer. State v. Home Ins. Co., 59 Neb. 524, 81 N.W. 443 (1900); Moore v. State, 53 Neb. 831, 74 N.W. 319 (1898).